New York, session 2025-2026, A4115.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 845-f 2 to read as follows: 3 § 845-f. Police officer and peace officer hiring and transfers. 1. 4 Police agencies shall thoroughly examine any possible internal files of 5 police misconduct and complaints before recruiting a police officer or 6 peace officer on a lateral transfer from another police agency, from a 7 police department from any state or American territory, or as a new 8 recruit. 9 2. No police agency shall recruit, hire, allow to enroll, or allow to 10 transfer any police officer or peace officer where such officer was 11 fired, relieved of their duty, or resigned as a result of: 12 (a) police misconduct; 13 (b) off-duty misconduct; 14 (c) an investigation for any kind of police misconduct and off-duty 15 misconduct; or 16 (d) a misdemeanor or felony charge. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08107-01-5